North Carolina statutes. Chapter 75. Monopolies, Trusts and Consumer Protection.
Article 2A. Identity Theft Protection Act.
§ 75-64.
Destruction of personal information records.

Any business that conducts business in North Carolina and any business that maintains or otherwise possesses personal information of a resident of North Carolina must take reasonable measures to protect against unauthorized access to or use of the information in connection with or after its disposal.

The reasonable measures must include:

Implementing and monitoring compliance with policies and procedures that require the burning, pulverizing, or shredding of papers containing personal information so that information cannot be practicably read or reconstructed.

Implementing and monitoring compliance with policies and procedures that require the destruction or erasure of electronic media and other nonpaper media containing personal information so that the information cannot practicably be read or reconstructed.

Describing procedures relating to the adequate destruction or proper disposal of personal records as official policy in the writings of the business entity.

A business may, after due diligence, enter into a written contract with, and monitor compliance by, another party engaged in the business of record destruction to destroy personal information in a manner consistent with this section. Due diligence should ordinarily include one or more of the following:

Reviewing an independent audit of the disposal business’s operations or its compliance with this statute or its equivalent.

Obtaining information about the disposal business from several references or other reliable sources and requiring that the disposal business be certified by a recognized trade association or similar third party with a reputation for high standards of quality review.

Reviewing and evaluating the disposal business’s information security policies or procedures or taking other appropriate measures to determine the competency and integrity of the disposal business.

A disposal business that conducts business in North Carolina or disposes of personal information of residents of North Carolina must take all reasonable measures to dispose of records containing personal information by implementing and monitoring compliance with policies and procedures that protect against unauthorized access to or use of personal information during or after the collection and transportation and disposing of such information.

This section does not apply to any of the following:

Any bank or financial institution that is subject to and in compliance with the privacy and security provision of the Gramm Leach Bliley Act, 15 U.S.C. § 6801, et seq., as amended.

Any health insurer or health care facility that is subject to and in compliance with the standards for privacy of individually identifiable health information and the security standards for the protection of electronic health information of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.

Any consumer reporting agency that is subject to and in compliance with the Federal Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681, et seq., as amended.

A violation of this section is a violation of

G.S. 75-1.1

, but any damages assessed against a business because of the acts or omissions of its nonmanagerial employees shall not be trebled as provided in

G.S. 75-16

unless the business was negligent in the training, supervision, or monitoring of those employees. No private right of action may be brought by an individual for a violation of this section unless such individual is injured as a result of the violation.

History.

2005-414, s. 1.

§ 75-65.
Protection from security breaches.

Any business that owns or licenses personal information of residents of North Carolina or any business that conducts business in North Carolina that owns or licenses personal information in any form (whether computerized, paper, or otherwise) shall provide notice to the affected person that there has been a security breach following discovery or notification of the breach. The disclosure notification shall be made without unreasonable delay, consistent with the legitimate needs of law enforcement, as provided in subsection (c) of this section, and consistent with any measures necessary to determine sufficient contact information, determine the scope of the breach and restore the reasonable integrity, security, and confidentiality of the data system. For the purposes of this section, personal information shall not include electronic identification numbers, electronic mail names or addresses, Internet account numbers, Internet identification names, parent’s legal surname prior to marriage, or a password unless this information would permit access to a person’s financial account or resources.

Any business that maintains or possesses records or data containing personal information of residents of North Carolina that the business does not own or license, or any business that conducts business in North Carolina that maintains or possesses records or data containing personal information that the business does not own or license shall notify the owner or licensee of the information of any security breach immediately following discovery of the breach, consistent with the legitimate needs of law enforcement as provided in subsection (c) of this section.

The notice required by this section shall be delayed if a law enforcement agency informs the business that notification may impede a criminal investigation or jeopardize national or homeland security, provided that such request is made in writing or the business documents such request contemporaneously in writing, including the name of the law enforcement officer making the request and the officer’s law enforcement agency engaged in the investigation. The notice required by this section shall be provided without unreasonable delay after the law enforcement agency communicates to the business its determination that notice will no longer impede the investigation or jeopardize national or homeland security.

The notice shall be clear and conspicuous. The notice shall include all of the following:

A description of the incident in general terms.

A description of the type of personal information that was subject to the unauthorized access and acquisition.

A description of the general acts of the business to protect the personal information from further unauthorized access.

A telephone number for the business that the person may call for further information and assistance, if one exists.

Advice that directs the person to remain vigilant by reviewing account statements and monitoring free credit reports.

The toll-free numbers and addresses for the major consumer reporting agencies.

The toll-free numbers, addresses, and Web site addresses for the Federal Trade Commission and the North Carolina Attorney General’s Office, along with a statement that the individual can obtain information from these sources about preventing identity theft.

For purposes of this section, notice to affected persons may be provided by one of the following methods:

Written notice.

Electronic notice, for those persons for whom it has a valid e-mail address and who have agreed to receive communications electronically if the notice provided is consistent with the provisions regarding electronic records and signatures for notices legally required to be in writing set forth in 15 U.S.C. § 7001.

Telephonic notice provided that contact is made directly with the affected persons.

Substitute notice, if the business demonstrates that the cost of providing notice would exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or that the affected class of subject persons to be notified exceeds 500,000, or if the business does not have sufficient contact information or consent to satisfy subdivisions (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection, for only those affected persons without sufficient contact information or consent, or if the business is unable to identify particular affected persons, for only those unidentifiable affected persons. Substitute notice shall consist of all the following:

E-mail notice when the business has an electronic mail address for the subject persons.

Conspicuous posting of the notice on the Web site page of the business, if one is maintained.

Notification to major statewide media.

(e1)

In the event a business provides notice to an affected person pursuant to this section, the business shall notify without unreasonable delay the Consumer Protection Division of the Attorney General’s Office of the nature of the breach, the number of consumers affected by the breach, steps taken to investigate the breach, steps taken to prevent a similar breach in the future, and information regarding the timing, distribution, and content of the notice.

In the event a business provides notice to more than 1,000 persons at one time pursuant to this section, the business shall notify, without unreasonable delay, the Consumer Protection Division of the Attorney General’s Office and all consumer reporting agencies that compile and maintain files on consumers on a nationwide basis, as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 1681a(p), of the timing, distribution, and content of the notice.

Any waiver of the provisions of this Article is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

A financial institution that is subject to and in compliance with the Federal Interagency Guidance Response Programs for Unauthorized Access to Consumer Information and Customer Notice, issued on March 7, 2005, by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, and the Office of Thrift Supervision; or a credit union that is subject to and in compliance with the Final Guidance on Response Programs for Unauthorized Access to Member Information and Member Notice, issued on April 14, 2005, by the National Credit Union Administration; and any revisions, additions, or substitutions relating to any of the said interagency guidance, shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section.

A violation of this section is a violation of

G.S. 75-1.1

. No private right of action may be brought by an individual for a violation of this section unless such individual is injured as a result of the violation.

Causes of action arising under this Article may not be assigned.

History.

2005-414, s. 1; 2009-355, s. 2; 2009-573, s. 10.

§ 75-66.
Publication of personal information.

It shall be a violation of this section for any person to knowingly broadcast or publish to the public on radio, television, cable television, in a writing of any kind, or on the Internet, the personal information of another with actual knowledge that the person whose personal information is disclosed has previously objected to any such disclosure.

As used in this section, “person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, trust, estate, cooperative, association, or other entity, but does not include any:

Government, government subdivision or agency.

Entity subject to federal requirements pursuant to the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA).

As used in this section, the phrase “personal information” includes a person’s first name or first initial and last name in combination with any of the following information:

Social security or employer taxpayer identification numbers.

Drivers license, State identification card, or passport numbers.

Checking account numbers.

Savings account numbers.

Credit card numbers.

Debit card numbers.

Personal Identification (PIN) Code as defined in G.S. 14-113.8(6).

Digital signatures.

Any other numbers or information that can be used to access a person’s financial resources.

Biometric data.

Fingerprints.

Passwords.

Nothing in this section shall:

Limit the requirements or obligations under any other section of this Article, including, but not limited to,

G.S. 75-62

and

G.S. 75-65

.

Apply to the collection, use, or release of personal information for a purpose permitted, authorized, or required by any federal, State, or local law, regulation, or ordinance.

Apply to data integration efforts to implement the State’s business intelligence strategy as provided by law or under contract.

Any person whose property or person is injured by reason of a violation of this section may sue for civil damages pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 1-539.2

C.

History.

2007-534, s. 2; 2012-142, s. 6A.7A(h).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-142, s. 6A.7A(h), effective July 1, 2012, added subdivision (d)(3).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Regulating Data Mining Post-Sorrell:
Using HIPAA to Restrict Marketing Uses of Patients’ Private Medical Information,” see 47 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1141 (2012).

§§ 75-67 through 75-79.

Reserved for future codification purposes.